Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1840
Action to defeat
purpose of sections; null and void.

Any action taken by any person convicted of a crime, whether
by way of execution of a power of attorney, creation of corporate entities
or otherwise, to defeat the purpose of sections
81-1836 to 81-1839 shall be null and void as against the public
policy of this state.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 40;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 16.